Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1040.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-EDIVERSITY INCLUSIVE CURRICULUM PILOT PROGRAMSection 1701-E. Scope of article.This article relates to the Diversity Inclusive Curriculum Pilot Program.Section 1702-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."LGBTQ+." Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, asexual, intersex or other similar characteristic of an individual."Pilot program." The Diversity Inclusive Curriculum Pilot Program established under this article."School entity." A school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 1703-E. Diversity Inclusive Curriculum Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The Diversity Inclusive Curriculum Pilot Program is established in the department to provide instruction to students on the political, economic and social contributions of individuals of the LGBTQ+ community.(b) Operation.--The pilot program shall operate for three full school years, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.(c) Selection of school entities.--(1) By July 15, 2026, the department may select school entities and nonpublic schools to participate in the pilot program.(2) To be eligible for the pilot program, a school entity or nonpublic school must submit a proposal to the department by May 15, 2026, that identifies how the school entity or nonpublic school will meet the guidelines established by the department for the pilot program.Section 1704-E. Department responsibilities.(a) Funding.--The department may use Federal, State and 20250HB1040PN1129 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other money to the extent that it is made available for the pilot program.(b) Consultation.--No later than six months after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall consult with professional organizations operating in this Commonwealth that serve diverse populations, including LGBTQ+ individuals in establishing, operating and evaluating the pilot program.(c) Guidelines.--By March 15, 2026, the department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the pilot program in consultation with professional organizations that serve diverse populations, including LGBTQ+ individuals. The department shall consider curriculum offered by organizations with 50% or greater LGBTQ+ leadership that specialize in and have expertise with LGBTQ+ individuals before selecting the curriculum to be used for the pilot program.Section 1705-E. Pilot program evaluation.(a) Report by school entities.--A participating school entity or nonpublic school shall annually report to the department data and information about the operation of the pilot program, in the manner prescribed by the department. At a minimum, a participating school entity or nonpublic school shall annually report to the department about how the participating school entity or nonpublic school met the objectives of the pilot program and any difficulty encountered in seeking to meet the objectives of the pilot program.(b) Evaluation.--The department shall contract with a nationally recognized educational evaluation institution or organization to provide an evaluation of the pilot program to review the effectiveness of the implementation of a curriculum inclusive to diverse individuals. The evaluation shall be 20250HB1040PN1129 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Report by department.--The department shall compile an annual report based on the data and information received about the operation of the pilot program. The department shall annually submit the report under this subsection by August 1 to all of the following:(1) The chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the Senate.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1040PN1129 - 4 - 123456789101112